Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 General Provisions

47-12-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board of trustees” means the Board of Trustees of the District Attorneys Retirement Fund of Georgia.

“Fund” means the District Attorneys Retirement Fund of Georgia.

“Member” means a member of the District Attorneys Retirement Fund of Georgia.

“Salary,” “fees,” and “compensation” includes all emoluments received by a district attorney for his services or resulting from the performance of his duties.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 163, § 4.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, District Attorneys’ Retirement Fund of Georgia, Chapter 513-11-1.